Idaho statutes. Title 26 BANKS AND BANKING
Chapter 21 IDAHO CREDIT UNION ACT
§ 26-2129. Reserve requirements.

At the end of each accounting period the gross income shall be determined. From this amount there shall be set aside, as a regular reserve against losses on loans and against such other losses as may be specified in rules prescribed under this chapter, sums in accordance with the following:

A credit union in operation for more than four (4) years and having assets of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or more shall set aside: (i) ten per cent (10%) of gross income until the regular reserve plus the allowance for loan loss account shall equal four per cent (4%) of the total of outstanding loans and risk assets, then (ii) five per cent (5%) of gross income until the regular reserve plus the allowance for loan loss account shall equal six per cent (6%) of the total of outstanding loans and risk assets.

A credit union in operation less than four (4) years or having assets of less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) shall set aside: (i) ten per cent (10%) of gross income until the regular reserve plus the allowance for loan loss account shall equal seven and one-half per cent (7.5%) of the total of outstanding loans and risk assets, then (ii) five per cent (5%) of gross income until the regular reserve plus the allowance for loan loss account shall equal ten per cent (10%) of the total of outstanding loans and risk assets.

Risk assets do not include loans fully secured by member savings and loans guaranteed by an agency of the state or federal government, to the extent of such guarantee.

Whenever the regular reserve plus the allowance for loan loss account falls below the stated per cent of the total outstanding loans and risk assets, it shall be replenished by regular contributions in such amounts as may be needed to maintain the stated reserve goals.

The director, in his discretion, may decrease the reserve requirements set forth in subsection (a) of this section when in his opinion such a decrease is necessary or desirable. The director may also require special reserves to protect the interests of members either by rule if it is to be generally applied, or by order for an individual credit union in a particular case.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2129, as added by 1991, ch. 236, § 5, p. 566.

§ 26-2130. Dividends.

After allocation to required reserves, the board of directors may, at the end of any dividend period duly established, declare a dividend to be paid on shares or share certificates from undivided earnings as the bylaws may provide. Dividends may be paid at various rates, or not paid at all, with due regard to the conditions that pertain to each class of share.

Subject to the approval of the board of directors, accounts closed between dividend periods may be credited with dividends at the rate set by the board of directors.

Extraordinary dividends must be calculated on a rational means determined by the board of directors. For purposes of this section, “extraordinary dividends” means all irregularly scheduled and declared dividends.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2130, as added by 2020, ch. 230, § 13, p. 671.

§ 26-2131. Share reduction.

Whenever the losses of any credit union, resulting from a depreciating in value of its loans or investments or otherwise, exceed its undivided earnings and reserve fund so that the estimated value of its assets is less than the total amount due the shareholders, the credit union may, by a majority vote of the entire membership, order a reduction in the shares of each of its shareholders to divide the loss proportionately among the members. If thereafter the credit union shall realize from such assets a greater amount than was fixed by the order of reduction, such excess shall be divided among the shareholders whose assets were reduced, but only to the extent of such reduction.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2131, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2132. Merger.

Any credit union may, with the approval of the director, merge with another credit union under the existing charter of such other credit union. The director shall not approve a merger if the effect of the merger would be to provide a broader common bond than allowable under section 26-2110, Idaho Code. The merger may be based upon any plan agreed to by the majority of the board of directors of each credit union joining in the merger, and approved by the affirmative vote of the majority of the members of each such credit union at meetings of the members called for such purpose. Any member not present at the meeting may, within the next twenty (20) days, vote by signing a statement on a form prescribed by the board of directors and such vote shall have as full force and effect as if cast at the meeting. If any such member does not vote within the twenty (20) day period, he shall be deemed to be in favor of the merger. After such agreement by the directors and approval by the members of each credit union, the president and secretary of each credit union shall execute a certificate of merger which shall set forth at least all of the following:

The time and place of the meeting of the board of directors at which the plan was agreed upon.

The vote in favor of adoption of the plan.

A copy of the resolution or other action by which the plan was agreed upon.

The time and place of the meeting of the members at which the plan agreed upon was approved.

The vote by which the plan was approved by the members.

Such certificates and a copy of the plan of the merger shall be forwarded to the director and if approved, a copy of the certificate shall be filed with the county clerk of the county in which each credit union participating in the merger has its principal place of business, and then filed with the director, whereupon the charter of the merged credit union as a legal entity separate from the surviving credit union shall terminate.

Upon any such merger so affected, all property, property rights, and interests of the merged credit union, shall vest in the surviving credit union without deed, endorsement or other instrument of transfer, and all debts, obligations and liabilities of the merged credit union shall be deemed to have been assumed by the surviving credit union whose charter the merger has affected.

This section shall be construed, when possible, to permit a credit union chartered under the Federal Credit Union Act to merge with one chartered under this chapter, or to permit one chartered under this chapter to merge with one chartered under the Federal Credit Union Act.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2132, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2133. Reports — Financial and statistical data.

Each credit union shall timely file with the director any financial and statistical report or other information that a federally insured state-chartered credit union is required to file with the national credit union administration. Each report must be certified by the principal operating officer of the credit union. In addition, a credit union shall file reports as may be required by the director.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2133, as added by 2020, ch. 230, § 15, p. 671.

§ 26-2134. Application fees.

For the purpose of paying the costs incident to the ascertainment of whether articles of incorporation should be issued, the subscribers to any such articles of incorporation shall pay, at the time of filing their articles of incorporation with the director, a fee as fixed by the director, but not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00), for the purpose of paying costs incident to the investigation of the application. All such fees shall be deposited with the state treasurer for the credit in the finance administrative account in the state dedicated fund.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2134, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582; am. 1984, ch. 47, § 4, p. 76.

§ 26-2135. Books and records.

The books and records of a credit union shall be kept in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and by procedures approved by the director. Every credit union shall keep correct and complete books of accounts, minutes of meetings of members and directors and shall make such books and records and accounts available for examination. The books of account and records shall not be removed from the principal place of business without the consent of the director.

If a credit union utilizes the data processing services of another company the providing of such services by the other corporation shall be subject to the approval of the director and the director shall have the power to require the servicing company to provide such information as the director requires in a form required by the director. Any company providing data processing services for credit unions must agree to provide the director with information for purposes of examination which the director may by rule or regulation require in a form required by the director.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2135, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2136. Fees.

On or before February 15 of each calendar year, the director shall fix and collect from each credit union an assessment fee based upon the total assets of the credit union as of December 31 of the previous calendar year, which fees shall not exceed the amounts set forth in the following schedule:

All fees, fines, examination and miscellaneous charges collected by the director pursuant to the Idaho credit union act shall be deposited into the finance administrative account pursuant to section 67-2702, Idaho Code.

$50,000 or less ...............................

$50.00 + $1.00 per thousand dollars of assets

Over $50,000 and not over

$100,000 ...............................

$100.00 + $.99 per thousand dollars of assets in excess of $50,000

Over $100,000 and not over

$250,000 ...............................

$149.00 + $.94 per thousand dollars of assets in excess of $100,000

Over $250,000 and not over

$1 million ...............................

$291.00 + $.89 per thousand dollars of assets in excess of $250,000

Over $1 million and not over

$2 million ...............................

$958.00 + $.80 per thousand dollars of assets in excess of $1 million

Over $2 million and not over

$5 million ...............................

$1,758.00 + $.61 per thousand dollars of assets in excess of $2 million

Over $5 million and not over

$8 million ...............................

$3,588.00 + $.48 per thousand dollars of assets in excess of $5 million

Over $8 million ...............................

$5,028.00 + $.35 per thousand dollars of assets in excess of $8 million

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2136, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582; am. 1980, ch. 168, § 1, p. 360; am. 1984, ch. 47, § 5, p. 76; am. 1999, ch. 202, § 1, p. 545; am. 2020, ch. 214, § 1, p. 625.

§ 26-2136A. Examinations and investigations reports — Access to records — Oaths — Subpoenas.

The director shall examine each credit union at least once every eighteen (18) months, unless the director determines with respect to a credit union that a less frequent examination schedule will satisfactorily protect the financial stability of the credit union and will satisfactorily assure compliance with the provisions of this chapter. The director shall examine a credit union more frequently whenever the director shall deem it necessary.

A report of examination conducted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be forwarded to the chairman of the board of directors and the president or chief executive officer after the completion of the examination. The report shall be considered at the first meeting of the board of directors following its receipt. A reply to the director of finance shall be forwarded by the board of directors within fifteen (15) days of the meeting.

Each credit union, including out-of-state and foreign credit unions permitted to operate in Idaho, and all of its officers and agents shall be required to give to representatives of the department of finance full access to review all books, papers, files, records, and other sources of information under their control, and retain copies of the same, and full access to personnel.

Upon examination or investigation of a credit union, the director:

May appraise and revalue the credit union’s investments; and

May require the credit union to charge off or set up a special reserve for loans and investments and other assets.

The director may make an examination and investigation into the affairs of:

An out-of-state or foreign credit union permitted to operate in Idaho;

A nonpublicly held organization, or its subsidiary, in which a credit union has a material investment;

A publicly held organization in which the capital stock or equity is controlled by a credit union;

A credit union service organization, or any subsidiary of a credit union service organization, in which a credit union has an interest;

An organization that is not a credit union, out-of-state credit union, federal credit union, or foreign credit union and that has a majority interest in a credit union service organization in which a credit union has an interest;

A sole proprietorship or organization primarily in the business of managing one (1) or more credit unions;

A person or business providing any of the following services to a credit union or to a credit union service organization:

Data processing services;

Activities that support financial services, including but not limited to lending funds transfer, fiduciary activities, trading activities, and deposit-taking; and

Internet-related services, including but not limited to web services and electronic bill payments, mobile applications, system and software development and maintenance, and security monitoring; or
(h) A corporation or other business entity that provides alternative share insurance in accordance with section 26-2153, Idaho Code.

In connection with examinations and investigations, the director may:

Administer oaths and examine under oath any person concerning the affairs of any credit union or of any person described in subsection (5) of this section; and

Issue subpoenas to and require the attendance and testimony of any person at any place within this state and require witnesses to produce books, papers, files, records, and other sources of information.

The director may accept in lieu of an examination under this section:

The report of an examiner authorized to examine a credit union or an out-of-state, federal, or foreign credit union or other financial institution; or

The report of an accountant, satisfactory to the director, who has made and submitted a report of the condition of the affairs of a credit union or an out-of-state, federal, or foreign credit union or other financial institution. The director may accept all or part of such a report in lieu of all or part of an examination. The accepted report or accepted part of the report has the same force and effect as an examination under this section.

The director shall have full access to all books, papers, files, records, personnel, and other sources of information under the control of persons described in this subsection.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2136A, as added by 2020, ch. 214, § 2, p. 625.

§ 26-2136B. Examination reports and specified other information confidential — Exceptions — Penalty.

The following shall be confidential and privileged and not subject to public disclosure under chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code, and shall be subject to the provisions of section 26-1111, Idaho Code:

Examination reports and information obtained by the department of finance in conducting examinations and investigations under this chapter;

All written communications between the department of finance and any credit union that relate in any manner to the examination or condition of the credit union;

Examination reports and related information from other financial institution regulators obtained by the department of finance;

Reports or parts of reports accepted in lieu of an examination under section 26-2136A, Idaho Code; and

Business plans and other proprietary information obtained by the department of finance in connection with a credit union’s application or notice to the department.

The director, any federal or other financial institution regulatory or supervisory agency, a private insurer authorized pursuant to section 26-2153, Idaho Code, and any credit union incorporated or chartered under title 26, Idaho Code, or under federal law or the law of any state and doing business in the state of Idaho shall each have a privilege to refuse to disclose and to prevent any other person from disclosing confidential communications, and the contents of any documents relating to any confidential communications, between the credit union and the department of finance or federal financial institution regulatory or supervisory agency or private insurer made during the regulatory relationship.
(2)(a) The director, any federal or other financial institution regulatory or supervisory agency, a private insurer authorized pursuant to section 26-2153, Idaho Code, and any credit union incorporated or chartered under title 26, Idaho Code, or under federal law or the law of any state and doing business in the state of Idaho shall each have a privilege to refuse to disclose and to prevent any other person from disclosing confidential communications, and the contents of any documents relating to any confidential communications, between the credit union and the department of finance or federal financial institution regulatory or supervisory agency or private insurer made during the regulatory relationship.

A communication is confidential if it is made during the regulatory relationship between the department of finance or the federal financial institution regulatory or supervisory agency or private insurer and any such credit union, and if the communication is not designed or intended for disclosure to any other parties.

The privilege may be claimed by the credit union or by the department of finance or the federal financial institution regulatory or supervisory agency, or by the lawyer for either. The privilege may be waived only in accordance with this section and section 26-1111, Idaho Code.

The director or the appropriate officer or employee of the federal financial institution regulatory or supervisory agency or private insurer may disclose confidential communications between the department of finance or agency or private insurer and credit union to the court, in camera, in a civil action. Such disclosure shall also be a privileged communication and the privilege may be claimed by the director, officer, or employee, or his lawyer.

No sanction may be imposed upon any credit union as a result of the claim of a privilege by the credit union or the director or the officer or employee of the federal supervisory agency under this section.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the director may furnish examination reports, work papers, final orders, or other information obtained in the conduct of an examination or investigation prepared by the director to:

Federal agencies empowered to examine credit unions or other financial institutions;

Officials empowered to investigate criminal charges. The director may furnish only that part of the report that is necessary and pertinent to the investigation, and only after notifying the affected credit union and members of the credit union who are named in that part of the examination report, or other person examined, that the report is being furnished to the officials, unless the officials requesting the report obtain a waiver of the notice requirement for good cause from a court of competent jurisdiction;

The examined credit union or other person examined, solely for its confidential use or for the confidential use of the credit union’s attorney, auditor, accountant, independent attorney, independent auditor, or independent accountant;

The attorney general in his role as legal advisor to the director;

Prospective merger partners or conservators, receivers, or liquidating agents of a troubled credit union;

Credit union regulators in other states or foreign jurisdictions regarding an out-of-state or foreign credit union conducting business in this state under this chapter, or regarding a credit union conducting business in the other state or jurisdiction;

A person officially connected with the credit union or other person examined, as officer, director, supervisory committee member, attorney, auditor, accountant, independent attorney, independent auditor, or independent accountant;

Organizations that have bonded the credit union to the extent that information is relevant to the renewal of the bond coverage or to a claim under the bond coverage;

Organizations insuring or guaranteeing the shares of, or deposits in, the credit union;

The federal home loan bank of which the credit union is a member or to which the credit union has applied for membership; or

Other persons as the director may determine necessary to protect the public interest and confidence.

Examination reports, work papers, temporary and final orders, consent orders, other information obtained in the conduct of an examination or investigation furnished under subsection (3) of this section, and all written communication between the department of finance and any credit union that relate in any manner to the condition of the credit union remain the property of the director and, if acquired by any person, shall be returned to the department of finance upon written demand. No person to whom reports are furnished or any officer, director, or employee thereof may disclose or make public the reports or information contained in the reports except in published statistical information that does not disclose the affairs of a person, except that nothing prevents the use in a criminal prosecution of reports furnished under subsection (3)(b) of this section.

In a civil action in which the reports or information are sought to be discovered or used as evidence, they may be disclosed only in accordance with subsection (2) of this section and section 26-1111, Idaho Code. After in-camera review of the reports or information in accordance with subsection (2) of this section and section 26-1111(3)(d), Idaho Code, the court may permit discovery and introduction of only those portions of the report or information that are relevant and otherwise unobtainable by the requesting party. To the extent the court permits discovery and introduction of relevant portions of the report or information, the court shall attach any limitations and restrictions necessary to ensure that the portions of the report or information discovered and introduced shall not be disclosed to the public. This subsection does not apply to an action brought or defended by the director.

Any person who knowingly violates a provision of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.
I.C.,§ 26-2136B, as added by 2020, ch. 214, § 3, p. 625.

§ 26-2136C. Disclosure of confidential information by the department — Penalty.

The department of finance, its director, employees, and former employees shall not disclose to any person or agency any fact or information obtained in the course of business of the department under this chapter, except in the course of their official duties for the department and in the following cases:

When, by the provisions of this chapter or chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code, it is made the duty of the department to make public records and publish the same;

When the department is required by law to take special action regarding the affairs of any credit union;

When called as a witness in any criminal proceeding in a court of competent jurisdiction, provided that the court must review such information in chambers to determine the necessity of disclosing such information, and subject to the privilege provided by sections 26-1111(3) and 26-2136B, Idaho Code;

When, in the case of a problem credit union, it is necessary or advisable, in the discretion of the director, for the good of the public or of the depositors; or

When, in the discretion of the department, it is advisable to disclose any such information to a state or federal credit union supervisory agency.

Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a felony, and conviction shall subject the offender to a forfeiture of his office or employment.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2136C, as added by 2020, ch. 214, § 4, p. 625.

§ 26-2137. False reports.

Any person, firm, corporation, or association which maliciously and knowingly spreads false reports about the management or finances of any credit union shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2137, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2138. Taxation.

A credit union shall be deemed an institution for savings and, together with all the accumulations therein, shall not be subject to taxation except as to real estate owned. The shares of a credit union shall not be subject to a stock transfer tax when issued by the corporation or when transferred from one (1) member to another.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2138, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2139. Conversion.

A state chartered credit union may be converted into a federal credit union by complying with the following requirements:

The proposition for such conversion shall first be approved and a date set for a vote thereof by the members, either at a meeting to be held on such date or by a written ballot to be filed on or before such date, by a majority of the board of directors of the state chartered credit union. Written notice of the proposition and of the date set for the vote shall be delivered in person to each member, or mailed to each member at the address for such member appearing on the records of the credit union not more than twenty (20) nor less than five (5) days prior to such date. Approval of the proposition for conversion shall require the majority of those votes cast in person or in writing.

A statement of results of the vote verified by the affidavits of the president or vice president and the secretary shall be filed with the director within ten (10) days after the vote is taken.

Promptly after the vote is taken and in no event later than ninety (90) days thereafter if the proposition for conversion is approved by such vote, the credit union shall take such action as may be necessary under the federal law to make it a federal credit union, and within ten (10) days after the receipt of the federal charter, notice shall be filed with the director that the charter has been issued.

Upon ceasing to be a state chartered credit union, such credit union shall no longer be subject to any of the provisions of this chapter.

A federally chartered credit union organized under the Federal Credit Union Act may be converted to a state chartered credit union by the following procedure: complying with all state requirements requisite to enabling it to meet proof of solvency and organization as required by this chapter.

When the director has been satisfied that all requirements of this chapter have been complied with, he shall approve the organizational certificate as a state chartered credit union as required by this chapter.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2139, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2140. Cease and desist order — Penalty.

If the director finds that any credit union has engaged in an unsafe or unsound practice in conducting the business of such credit union, or any person has violated any provision of this chapter, any rule or order issued under this chapter, any condition imposed in writing by the director, or any written agreement entered into with the director, the director may order the credit union or other person to cease and desist from any such violation or practice. Such order shall be issued pursuant to chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

After providing a notice and an opportunity for a public hearing pursuant to chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, the director may assess against and collect a civil money penalty from any credit union or from any director, officer, supervisory committee member, employee, agent, or other person participating in the conduct of the affairs of such credit union who:

Engages or participates in any unsafe or unsound practice in connection with a credit union; or

Violates or knowingly permits any person to violate any of the provisions of this chapter, any rule promulgated pursuant to this chapter, or any lawful order of the director issued pursuant to this chapter.

A civil money penalty assessed pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day for each day such violation continues. No civil money penalty shall be assessed for the same act or practice if another government agency has taken similar action against the credit union or person to be assessed such civil money penalty. In determining the amount of the civil money penalty to be assessed, the director of the department of finance shall consider:

The good faith of the credit union or person to be assessed with such civil money penalty;

The gravity of the violation;

Any previous violations by the credit union or person to be assessed with such civil money penalty;

The nature and extent of any previous violations; and

Such other matters as the director may deem appropriate.

Upon waiver by the respondent of the right to a public hearing concerning an assessment of a civil money penalty, the hearing or portions thereof may be closed to the public when concerns arise about prompt withdrawal of moneys from or the safety and soundness of the credit union.

For the purposes of this section, a violation shall include but is not limited to any action by any person alone or with another person that causes, brings about, or results in the participation in, counseling of, or aiding or abetting of a violation.

The director may modify or set aside any order assessing a civil money penalty.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2140, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582; am. 2020, ch. 214, § 5, p. 625.

§ 26-2140A. Conservatorship.

The director may, in his discretion and without notice, appoint himself or an agent as conservator and immediately take possession and control of the business and assets of any credit union in any case in which:

The director determines that such action is necessary to conserve the assets of any credit union or to protect the interests of the members of such credit union;

The credit union, by a resolution of its board of directors, consents to such an action by the director;

There is a violation of a cease and desist order, or any law, rule, regulation or any written agreement entered into with the director; or

There is concealment of books, papers, records, or assets of the credit union or refusal to submit books, papers, records, or affairs of the credit union for inspection to any examiner or to any lawful agent of the director.

Not later than thirty (30) calendar days after the date on which the director takes possession and control of the business and assets of a credit union, such credit union may apply to the district court for the judicial district in which the credit union is located for an order requiring the director to show cause why he should not be enjoined from continuing such possession and control. Except as provided in this subsection, no court may take any action, except at the request of the director, to restrain or affect the exercise of powers or functions of the director as conservator.

The director may maintain possession and control of the business and assets of such credit union and may operate such credit union until such time as:

The director shall permit such credit union to continue business subject to such terms and conditions as may be imposed by the director;

Such credit union is placed in receivership in accordance with the provisions of section 26-2141, Idaho Code; or

Otherwise ordered by the district court of the judicial district in which the credit union is located.

The director may appoint such agents as he considers necessary in order to carry out his duties as conservator.

All expenses of the credit union during the period of the conservatorship shall be paid by the credit union.

The conservator shall have all the powers of the members, the directors, the officers, and the committees of the credit union and shall be authorized to operate the credit union in its own name or to conserve its assets in the manner and to the extent authorized by the director.

The authority granted in this section is in addition to all other authority granted to the director under this chapter.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2140A, as added by 1991, ch. 236, § 6, p. 566; am. 2020, ch. 214, § 6, p. 625.

§ 26-2140B. Suspension or removal of directors, supervisory committee members, officers, or employees — Prohibition of future employment.

The director may issue a written order, pursuant to chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, suspending or removing a credit union director, supervisory committee member, officer, or employee upon finding that the director, supervisory committee member, officer, or employee has:

Been dishonest or reckless in the performance of his official duties;

Breached his fiduciary duties to the credit union in a manner that is likely to cause substantial loss or seriously weaken the credit union;

Violated any provision of this chapter, any state or federal law or regulation pertaining to the business of the credit union, or any order of the director;

Been convicted of a felony or any misdemeanor involving theft or dishonesty; or

Engaged or participated in any unsafe or unsound practice in the conduct of the affairs of the credit union.

In the event a director, supervisory committee member, officer, or employee has been removed from office as set forth in this section, and the order has not been modified, rescinded, or set aside, or if a person has been removed as a director, supervisory committee member, officer, or employee of a credit union by a federal financial institution regulator or a financial institution regulator in another state, the person is prohibited from becoming employed by a credit union supervised by the director in this state, except as specifically permitted by the director.

The director, officer, employee, or credit union affected by order of the director may immediately petition the district court in the judicial district of the county in which the credit union has its principal place of business or in Ada county to set aside the order of the director. Upon the filing of such petition, the court shall have the jurisdiction to affirm or set aside in whole or in part and remand to the director.

An order issued under this section must contain a statement of the facts that constitute grounds for removal or prohibition and cite relevant state or federal law or regulation.

A prevailing party in any proceeding under this section may be awarded attorney’s fees and costs pursuant to section 12-117, Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2140B, as added by 2020, ch. 214, § 8, p. 625.

§ 26-2141. Appointment of receiver — Conditions — Proceeding — Bond — Reporting schedule — Subrogation of federal agency to rights of deposit owners.

If a credit union refuses to pay its shares, deposits, or obligations in accordance with the terms under which the shares were received or the deposits or obligations were incurred, becomes insolvent, or refuses to submit its books, papers, and records for inspection by the director, or if it appears to the director that the credit union is in an unsafe and unsound condition, the director may apply to the district court for Ada county or for the county in which the principal place of business of the credit union is located for appointment of a receiver for the credit union.

In a proceeding for the appointment of a receiver, the court may act upon the application immediately and without notice to any person. If at any time it appears to the court that the asserted reasons for receivership may not exist, the court shall order the director to show cause as to why the court should not dissolve the receivership.

An insuring federal agency or private share insurer may act as receiver without bond. All other receivers, with the exception of an employee of the Idaho department of finance appointed as receiver in his official capacity, shall post a bond in an amount determined by the court.

A receiver shall report to the director regarding all matters involving the receivership on a schedule established by the director.

If a credit union is closed and placed in receivership, and the insuring federal agency or private share insurer pays or makes available for payment the insured shares and deposit liabilities of the closed credit union, the federal agency or private share insurer, whether or not it has become receiver of the credit union, is subrogated to all of the rights of the owners of the deposits against the closed credit union in the same manner and to the same extent as subrogation of the federal agency or private share insurer under the laws governing the federal agency or private share insurer.

For purposes of this section, “insolvent” means a credit union that meets either of the following:

It is not able to pay its debts and other obligations, including those related to member shares, as they become due; or

Its liabilities exceed its assets.

If a federal agency is appointed as receiver of a credit union, the receivership procedures of the federal agency shall govern the receivership.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2141, as added by 2020, ch. 214, § 10, p. 625.